Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 8. Hazardous Chemicals, Materials, and Wastes.

Collateral references. —

Hazardous waste, validity of local regulation of hazardous waste. 67 ALR4th 822.

Sec. 29.35.500.
Reporting.

If a municipality establishes a program for the reporting of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes, then the municipality shall require a business or a government agency that handles hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes to submit to a designated person or office of the municipality, on a form approved by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission, an inventory of the hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes the business or government agency handles. Notwithstanding other provisions of this title, a municipality that establishes a program for the reporting of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes may not

use a form other than the one required under this section or use a form in addition to the one required under this section;

require a business or government agency to submit an inventory of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes unless the business or government agency is required to do so by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission;

require reporting under this section of a substance not listed in (c) of this section unless it is added by the commission under (c) of this section;

require reporting under this section of a substance that is in smaller quantities than provided under (c) of this section unless the reporting of smaller quantities is approved by the commission under (c) of this section.

An inventory required under this section must include

the name and address of a facility, and of the owner and operator of the facility, at which the hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes are handled;

the names and telephone numbers of persons connected with the facility who are to be contacted in an emergency;

the chemical name or other descriptive information about each hazardous chemical, hazardous material, or hazardous waste handled;

the location and maximum estimated quantity of the hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes handled in a single day;

with respect to a transshipment facility; instead of the information required under (3) and (4) of this subsection, the following information:

a list of the classes of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes handled;

a site layout and floor plan showing the usual locations of the hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes handled at the facility; and

the method of marking or warning used for hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes at the facility.

Unless the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission or a municipality, after public hearing, removes a substance listed in this subsection from the reporting requirements within its jurisdiction, or unless the commission, after public hearing, adds a substance to the reporting requirements of this subsection or requires the reporting of smaller quantities of the substances listed in this subsection, either on a statewide basis or for reporting within particular municipalities, the following quantities of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes shall be reported in an inventory required under this section:

any quantity of a hazardous material of the hazard class identified in federal placarding regulations as

Poison Gas Hazard Division No. 2.3 and Poisons 6.1;

Explosives 1.1;

Explosives 1.2 and 1.3, excluding smokeless gunpowder, black powder, and ammunition;

Flammable solid Divisions 4.1, 4.2, and 4.3; or

Radioactive Hazard Class 7;

a hazardous chemical, or a hazardous material other than one described in (1) of this subsection, if handled in a single day in an amount equal to or greater than 10,000 pounds;

extremely hazardous substances in a quantity equal to or more than 500 pounds or the threshold planning quantity, whichever is less; and

compressed gasses equal to or more than 1,000 cubic feet at standard temperature and pressure.

A business or government agency required to submit an inventory under this section shall submit the first inventory within 90 days after the municipality’s reporting requirements take effect or within 30 days after beginning to engage in the handling of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes. Thereafter, the business or government agency shall submit an inventory annually. With respect to transshipments, the first inventory shall be an estimate of transshipments by the business or government agency during the next 12 months. Subsequent annual inventories shall reflect actual transshipments during the previous 12 months.

A municipality that establishes a program for the reporting of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes shall also require a business or government agency that handles hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes to report

significant change in the general location of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes by telephone or other means adequate to convey the information within 24 hours, and in writing within 10 working days, after moving the chemicals, materials, or wastes;

names and other descriptive information of additional hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes being handled since the last inventory or report if they meet the criteria for reporting under (c) of this section, by telephone or other means adequate to convey the information within 24 hours, and in writing within 10 working days, after making the additions;

with respect to a transshipment facility, instead of the information required under (1) and (2) of this subsection, the following:

an additional class of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes handled at the facility, or a change in the method of marking or warning used for hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes at the facility, within 30 days after the addition or change; and

a change to the site layout or floor plan submitted under (b)(5)(B) of this section, by telephone or other means adequate to convey the information within 24 hours, and in writing within 30 days after the change.

A municipality that establishes a program for the reporting of hazardous chemicals or hazardous materials may require a business or government agency that handles hazardous chemicals or hazardous materials to submit a federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) Material Safety Data Sheet or equivalent information for each of the chemicals and materials handled.

The requirements of this section may be imposed by a municipality on a business or government agency that handles hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes outside of the boundaries of the municipality if a fire or other emergency involving the chemicals, materials, or wastes would be

likely to adversely affect persons or property in the municipality; or

responded to by emergency response personnel whose service area includes all or a part of the municipality.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am §§ 5 — 11 ch 143 SLA 1988; am §§ 5, 6 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For Alaska State Emergency Response Commission, see AS

26.23.071

.

Administrative Code. —

For municipality of Anchorage reporting requirements, see 10 AAC 20, art. 1.

Sec. 29.35.510.
Inspections; penalties.

A municipality may conduct inspections, and establish and impose penalties, necessary to ensure compliance with reporting requirements adopted under AS

29.35.500

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Sec. 29.35.520.
Fees.

A municipality may impose appropriate fees to fully or partially compensate for the cost of processing reports and administering inspections under AS

29.35.500

—

29.35.510

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 143 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Sec. 29.35.530.
Duties of municipalities; powers of other agencies.

The municipality, at the request of a business or government agency required to submit an inventory under AS

29.35.500

, shall provide

a descriptive summary of the hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes that are required to be included in an inventory; and

inventory forms approved by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 71 SLA 1997.]

The division of fire prevention, the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Health and Social Services, or the Department of Labor and Workforce Development may

request copies of inventories submitted under AS

29.35.500

; and

provide educational materials related to hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am § 13 ch 143 SLA 1988; am §§ 9, 15 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For Alaska State Emergency Response Commission, see AS

26.23.071

.

Sec. 29.35.540.
Public access to information.

Information obtained by a municipality under AS

29.35.500

,

29.35.510

, and

29.35.530

shall be made readily available to the public for inspection and copying.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986)

Sec. 29.35.550.
Application.

AS

29.35.500

—

29.35.590

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986)

Sec. 29.35.560.
Municipal liability.

The establishment by a municipality of a program for the reporting of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, and hazardous wastes does not increase the liability that may otherwise be imposed on the municipality for damages resulting from hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous waste.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 143 SLA 1988)

Sec. 29.35.590.
Definitions.

In AS

29.35.500

—

29.35.590

,

“acute hazardous waste” means a waste listed by the administrator or the Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with the criteria in 40 C.F.R. 261.11(a)(2);

“extremely hazardous substance” means a substance listed in 40 C.F.R. Part 355, Appendix A and B;

“handles” includes disposes of, generates, processes, stores, treats, transships, and uses hazardous chemicals, materials, or wastes, but does not include the handling of hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes while they are in transit and before they reach the final destination indicated on the shipping paper accompanying the shipment, except while they are at a transshipment facility; in this paragraph, “shipping paper” has the meaning given in 49 C.F.R. 171.8;

“hazard class” means the class of a hazardous material defined in 49 C.F.R. 173;

“hazardous chemical” has the meaning given in 29 C.F.R. 1910.1200(c) except that it does not include

a food, food additive, color additive, drug, or cosmetic regulated by the federal Food and Drug Administration;

a substance present as a solid in a manufactured item to the extent exposure to the substance does not occur under normal conditions of use;

a substance to the extent it is used for personal, family, or household purposes, or is present in the same form and concentration as a product packaged for distribution and use by the general public;

a substance to the extent it is used in a research laboratory or a hospital or other medical facility under the direct supervision of a technically qualified individual; or

a substance to the extent it is used in routine agricultural operations or is a fertilizer held for sale by a retailer to the ultimate customer;

“hazardous material” means a material or substance, as defined in 49 C.F.R. 171.8, and any other substance determined by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission in regulations to pose a significant health and safety hazard; “hazardous material” does not include food, drugs, alcoholic beverages, cosmetics, tobacco, or tobacco products intended for personal consumption;

“hazardous waste” means

a hazardous waste as defined in AS

46.03.900

;

a hazardous waste as identified by the Environmental Protection Agency under 40 C.F.R. 261; and

any other hazardous waste defined by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission in regulations;

“quantity” means the total amount of a material or waste handled at a time and includes the aggregate of a material or waste that is divided among multiple containers;

“threshold planning quantity” means the quantity listed in the column “threshold planning quantity” for a substance listed in 40 C.F.R. Part 355, Appendix A and B;

“transshipment facility” means a building, dock, yard or other structure or area at which hazardous chemicals, hazardous materials, or hazardous wastes are held, or transferred from one vehicle, vessel, or container to another, for the purpose of reshipment within seven days after arriving at the facility, if regularly holding or transferring within that period of time is the principal business of the facility.

History.

(§ 4 ch 108 SLA 1986; am §§ 15, 16 ch 143 SLA 1988; am §§ 10 — 12, 15 ch 71 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 2008 to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (2).

Cross references. —

For Alaska State Emergency Response Commission, see AS

26.23.071

.